Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3025.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [84.977] NATURE AS WE AGE; GRANT PROGRAM. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Establishment. new text end new text begin The commissioner of natural resources must establish and administer a program to provide grants for natural-resource-based outdoor education and recreation opportunities for older adults. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Eligibility. new text end new text begin The commissioner may award grants under this section to public entities or private nonprofit organizations. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Priorities. new text end new text begin In awarding grants under this section, the commissioner must give priority to grants that: new text end new text begin (1) provide older adults with opportunities to directly experience nature and the natural world; new text end new text begin (2) maximize the number of participants that can be served; new text end new text begin (3) serve older adults with limited opportunities to participate in natural-resource-based outdoor activities; new text end new text begin (4) use public parks and other natural resource venues and personnel as a resource; and new text end new text begin (5) commit matching funds or in-kind resources. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of natural resources for the nature as we age grant program under Minnesota Statutes, section 84.977. new text end